Hawaii statutes.
§454F-14 Confidentiality. (a) Except
as otherwise provided in Public Law 110-289, section 1512, the requirements
under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any
information or material provided to NMLS, and any privilege arising under
federal or state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with
respect to the information or material shall continue to apply to the
information or material after the information or material has been disclosed to
NMLS. The information and material may be shared with all state and federal
regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the
loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by
federal or state law.

(b) For these purposes, the commissioner is
authorized to enter into agreements or sharing arrangements with other
governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American
Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, or other associations
representing governmental agencies as established by rule or order of the
commissioner.

(c) Information or material that is subject to
a privilege or confidentiality under subsection (a) shall not be subject to:

(1) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing
the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency of
the federal government or a state; or

(2) Subpoena or discovery, or admission into
evidence, in any private civil action or administrative process, unless with
respect to any privilege held by NMLS applicable to the information or material;
provided that the person to whom the information or material pertains waives,
in whole or in part, in the discretion of such person, that privilege.

(d) Notwithstanding chapter 92F, the examination
process and related information and documents, including the reports of
examination, are confidential and are not subject to discovery or disclosure in
civil or criminal lawsuits.

(e) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or any information or
material described in subsection (a) that is inconsistent with subsection (a)
shall be superseded by the requirements of this section.

(f) This section shall not apply to
information or material relating to the employment history of, and publicly
adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against, mortgage loan
originators and mortgage loan originator companies that are included in NMLS
for access by the public. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 168, §20; am
L 2014, c 198, §6; am L 2016, c 122, §14]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next